Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 19 Freedom of Information Act of 1967
25-19-106. Open public meetings. [Effective until emergency ends or December 31, 2020.]

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all meetings, formal or informal, special or regular, of the governing bodies of all municipalities, counties, townships, and school districts and all boards, bureaus, commissions, or organizations of the State of Arkansas, except grand juries, supported wholly or in part by public funds or expending public funds, shall be public meetings.

(1)The time and place of each regular meeting shall be furnished to anyone who requests the information.

In the event of emergency or special meetings, the person calling the meeting shall notify the representatives of the newspapers, radio stations, and television stations, if any, located in the county in which the meeting is to be held and any news media located elsewhere that cover regular meetings of the governing body and that have requested to be so notified of emergency or special meetings of the time, place, and date of the meeting. Notification shall be made at least two (2) hours before the meeting takes place in order that the public shall have representatives at the meeting.

(1)(A)Except as provided under subdivision (c)(6) of this section, an executive session will be permitted only for the purpose of considering employment, appointment, promotion, demotion, disciplining, or resignation of any public officer or employee.

The specific purpose of the executive session shall be announced in public before going into executive session.

(A)Only the person holding the top administrative position in the public agency, department, or office involved, the immediate supervisor of the employee involved, and the employee may be present at the executive session when so requested by the governing body, board, commission, or other public body holding the executive session.

Any person being interviewed for the top administrative position in the public agency, department, or office involved may be present at the executive session when so requested by the governing board, commission, or other public body holding the executive session.

Executive sessions must never be called for the purpose of defeating the reason or the spirit of this chapter.

No resolution, ordinance, rule, contract, regulation, or motion considered or arrived at in executive session will be legal unless, following the executive session, the public body reconvenes in public session and presents and votes on the resolution, ordinance, rule, contract, regulation, or motion.

(A)Boards and commissions of this state may meet in executive session for purposes of preparing examination materials and answers to examination materials that are administered to applicants for licensure from state agencies.

Boards and commissions are excluded from this chapter for the administering of examinations to applicants for licensure.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (c)(4) of this section, a public agency may meet in executive session for the purpose of considering, evaluating, or discussing matters pertaining to public water system security or municipally owned utility system security as described in §25-19-105(b)(18).

An executive session held by the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee under §10-3-3201 et seq. is exempt from this section.

(1)All officially scheduled, special, and called open public meetings shall be recorded in a manner that allows for the capture of sound, including without limitation:

A sound-only recording;

A video recording with sound and picture; or

A digital or analog broadcast capable of being recorded.

A recording of an open public meeting shall be maintained by a public entity for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of the open public meeting.

The recording shall be maintained in a format that may be reproduced upon a request under this chapter.

Subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:

Executive sessions; or

Volunteer fire departments.

Cities of the second class and incorporated towns are exempt from subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section until July 1, 2020.

(1)If the Governor declares a disaster emergency under the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, §12-75-101 et seq., a public entity may assemble, gather, meet, and conduct an open public meeting through electronic means, including without limitation by:

Telephone;

Video conference; or

Video broadcast.

If an open public meeting is held under subdivision (e)(1) of this section:

The public may attend the open public meeting using electronic means; and

Notice of the method the public may attend the open public meeting shall be published with the notice of the open public meeting.

Physical presence of the public or of an individual member of the public entity at the open public meeting is not required under this subsection.

The open public meeting shall be recorded in the format in which it is conducted, including without limitation:

A sound-only recording;

A video recording with sound and picture; or

A digital or analog broadcast capable of being recorded.

A public entity shall maintain the records of an open public meeting held under this subsection for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of the open public meeting.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 93, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1201, § 1; 1985, No. 843, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2805; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1001, § 1; 1999, No. 1589, § 1; 2001, No. 1259, § 2; 2003, No. 763, § 3; 2005, No. 259, § 3; 2007, No. 268, § 3; 2007, No. 998, § 3; 2009, No. 631, § 3; 2011, No. 99, § 3; 2013, No. 235, § 3; 2015, No. 186, § 4; 2017, No. 713, § 11; 2019, No. 1028, § 1; 2020, No. 2, §
42.

25-19-106. Open public meetings. [Effective when emergency ends or on December 31, 2020.]

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all meetings, formal or informal, special or regular, of the governing bodies of all municipalities, counties, townships, and school districts and all boards, bureaus, commissions, or organizations of the State of Arkansas, except grand juries, supported wholly or in part by public funds or expending public funds, shall be public meetings.

(1)The time and place of each regular meeting shall be furnished to anyone who requests the information.

In the event of emergency or special meetings, the person calling the meeting shall notify the representatives of the newspapers, radio stations, and television stations, if any, located in the county in which the meeting is to be held and any news media located elsewhere that cover regular meetings of the governing body and that have requested to be so notified of emergency or special meetings of the time, place, and date of the meeting. Notification shall be made at least two (2) hours before the meeting takes place in order that the public shall have representatives at the meeting.

(1)(A)Except as provided under subdivision (c)(6) of this section, an executive session will be permitted only for the purpose of considering employment, appointment, promotion, demotion, disciplining, or resignation of any public officer or employee.

The specific purpose of the executive session shall be announced in public before going into executive session.

(A)Only the person holding the top administrative position in the public agency, department, or office involved, the immediate supervisor of the employee involved, and the employee may be present at the executive session when so requested by the governing body, board, commission, or other public body holding the executive session.

Any person being interviewed for the top administrative position in the public agency, department, or office involved may be present at the executive session when so requested by the governing board, commission, or other public body holding the executive session.

Executive sessions must never be called for the purpose of defeating the reason or the spirit of this chapter.

No resolution, ordinance, rule, contract, regulation, or motion considered or arrived at in executive session will be legal unless, following the executive session, the public body reconvenes in public session and presents and votes on the resolution, ordinance, rule, contract, regulation, or motion.

(A)Boards and commissions of this state may meet in executive session for purposes of preparing examination materials and answers to examination materials that are administered to applicants for licensure from state agencies.

Boards and commissions are excluded from this chapter for the administering of examinations to applicants for licensure.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (c)(4) of this section, a public agency may meet in executive session for the purpose of considering, evaluating, or discussing matters pertaining to public water system security or municipally owned utility system security as described in §25-19-105(b)(18).

An executive session held by the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee under §10-3-3201 et seq. is exempt from this section.

(1)All officially scheduled, special, and called open public meetings shall be recorded in a manner that allows for the capture of sound, including without limitation:

A sound-only recording;

A video recording with sound and picture; or

A digital or analog broadcast capable of being recorded.

A recording of an open public meeting shall be maintained by a public entity for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of the open public meeting.

The recording shall be maintained in a format that may be reproduced upon a request under this chapter.

Subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:

Executive sessions; or

Volunteer fire departments.

Cities of the second class and incorporated towns are exempt from subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section until July 1, 2020.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 93, § 5; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1201, § 1; 1985, No. 843, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2805; reen. Acts 1987, No. 1001, § 1; 1999, No. 1589, § 1; 2001, No. 1259, § 2; 2003, No. 763, § 3; 2005, No. 259, § 3; 2007, No. 268, § 3; 2007, No. 998, § 3; 2009, No. 631, § 3; 2011, No. 99, § 3; 2013, No. 235, § 3; 2015, No. 186, § 4; 2017, No. 713, § 11; 2019, No. 1028, § 1; 2020, No. 2, §
42.

25-19-107. Appeal from denial of rights — Attorney's fees.

Any citizen denied the rights granted to him or her by this chapter may appeal immediately from the denial to the Pulaski County Circuit Court or to the circuit court of the residence of the aggrieved party, if the State of Arkansas or a department, agency, or institution of the state is involved, or to any of the circuit courts of the appropriate judicial districts when an agency of a county, municipality, township, or school district, or a private organization supported by or expending public funds, is involved.

Upon written application of the person denied the rights provided for in this chapter, or any interested party, it shall be mandatory upon the circuit court having jurisdiction to fix and assess a day the petition is to be heard within seven (7) days of the date of the application of the petitioner, and to hear and determine the case.

Those who refuse to comply with the orders of the court shall be found guilty of contempt of court.

(1)In any action to enforce the rights granted by this chapter, or in any appeal therefrom, the court shall assess against the defendant reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation expenses reasonably incurred by a plaintiff who has substantially prevailed unless the court finds that the position of the defendant was substantially justified .

If the defendant has substantially prevailed in the action, the court may assess expenses against the plaintiff only upon a finding that the action was initiated primarily for frivolous or dilatory purposes.

(1)Notwithstanding subsection (d)(1) of this section, the court shall not assess reasonable attorney's fees or other litigation expenses reasonably incurred by a plaintiff against the State of Arkansas or a department, agency, or institution of the state.

(A)A plaintiff who substantially prevailed in an action under this section against the State of Arkansas or a department, agency, or institution of the state may file a claim with the Arkansas State Claims Commission to recover reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation expenses reasonably incurred.

A claim for reasonable attorney's fees and litigation expenses reasonably incurred in an action against the State of Arkansas or a department, agency, or institution of the state shall be filed with the commission pursuant to §19-10-201 et seq. within sixty (60) days of the final disposition of the appeal under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 93, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2806; Acts 1987, No. 49, § 2; 2009, No. 440, § 2.

25-19-108. Information for public guidance.

Each state agency, board, and commission shall prepare and make available:

(1)All materials made available by a state agency, board, or commission pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and created after July 1, 2003, shall be made publicly accessible, without charge, in electronic form via the internet.

It shall be a sufficient response to a request to inspect or copy the materials that they are available on the internet at a specified location, unless the requester specifies another medium or format under §25-19-105(d)(2)(B).

(1)An entity that is subject to this chapter that is not included in subsection (a) of this section may opt in to any provision under subdivisions (a)(1)-(5) of this section through ordinance or resolution enacted by its governing body.

The ordinance or resolution under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall comply with subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1653, § 3; 2017, No. 1107, § 2.

25-19-109. Special requests for electronic information.

(1)At his or her discretion, a custodian may agree to summarize, compile, or tailor electronic data in a particular manner or medium and may agree to provide the data in an electronic format to which it is not readily convertible.

Where the cost and time involved in complying with the requests are relatively minimal, custodians should agree to provide the data as requested.

(1)If the custodian agrees to a request, the custodian may charge the actual, verifiable costs of personnel time exceeding two (2) hours associated with the tasks, in addition to copying costs authorized by §25-19-105(d)(3).

The charge for personnel time shall not exceed the salary of the lowest paid employee or contractor who, in the discretion of the custodian, has the necessary skill and training to respond to the request.

The custodian shall provide an itemized breakdown of charges under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1653, § 4.

25-19-110. Exemptions.

Beginning July 1, 2009, in order to be effective, a law that enacts a new exemption to the requirements of this chapter or that substantially amends an existing exemption to the requirements of this chapter shall state that the record or meeting is exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

For purposes of this section:

An exemption from the requirements of this chapter is substantially amended if the amendment expands the scope of the exemption to include more records or information or to include meetings as well as records; and

An exemption from the requirements of this chapter is not substantially amended if the amendment narrows the scope of the exemption.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 184, § 1.

25-19-111. Arkansas Freedom of Information Task Force.

(1)There is created the Arkansas Freedom of Information Task Force for the purpose of reviewing, evaluating, and approving proposed amendments to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

No later than the first day of November in each even-numbered year preceding a regular legislative session, the task force shall:

A majority vote of the total membership of the task force is required for any action of the task force.

(A)The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall call the first meeting of the task force, which shall occur within sixty (60) days of August 1, 2017.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 923, § 1.